Utah statutes.
17B-2a-513.   Temporary application of water to land.
(1)  Upon the written application of the owner of land that has no water
allotment or an insufficient water allotment, an irrigation district board of
trustees may temporarily permit water to be applied to the land and charge the
owner for that water.
(2)  Subsection (1) may not be construed to affect an irrigation district's
permanent water allotments.
